Utah statutes.
26-4-12.   Order to exhume body -- Procedure.

(1)  In case of any death described in Section 26-4-7, when a body is buried without an investigation by the medical examiner as to the cause and manner of death, it shall be the duty of the medical examiner, upon being advised of the fact, to notify the district attorney or county attorney having criminal jurisdiction where the body is buried or death occurred.  Upon notification, the district attorney or county attorney having criminal jurisdiction may file an action in the district court to obtain an order to exhume the body.  A district judge may order the body exhumed upon an ex parte hearing.

(2) (a)  A body may not be exhumed until notice of the order has been served upon the executor or administrator of the deceased's estate, or if no executor or administrator has been appointed, upon the nearest heir of the deceased, determined as if the deceased had died intestate.  If the nearest heir of the deceased cannot be located within the jurisdiction, then the next heir in succession within the jurisdiction may be served.

(b)  The executor, administrator, or heir shall have 24 hours to notify the issuing court of any objection to the order prior to the time the body is exhumed.  If no heirs can be located within the jurisdiction within 24 hours, the facts shall be reported to the issuing court which may order that the body be exhumed forthwith.

(c)  Notification to the executor, administrator, or heir shall specifically state the nature of the action and the fact that any objection shall be filed with the issuing court within 24 hours of the time of service.

(d)  In the event an heir files an objection, the court shall set hearing on the matter at the earliest possible time and issue an order on the matter immediately at the conclusion of the hearing.  Upon the receipt of notice of objection, the court shall immediately notify the county attorney who requested the order, so that the interest of the state may be represented at the hearing.

(e)  When there is reason to believe that death occurred in a manner described in Section 26-4-7, the district attorney or county attorney having criminal jurisdiction may make a motion that the court, upon ex parte hearing, order the body exhumed forthwith and without notice.  Upon a showing of exigent circumstances the court may order the body exhumed forthwith and without notice.  In any event, upon motion of the district attorney or county attorney having criminal jurisdiction and upon the personal appearance of the medical examiner, the court for good cause may order the body exhumed forthwith and without notice.

(3)  An order to exhume a body shall be directed to the medical examiner, commanding the medical examiner to cause the body to be exhumed, perform the required autopsy, and properly cause the body to be reburied upon completion of the examination.

(4)  The examination shall be completed and the complete autopsy report shall be made to the district attorney or county attorney having criminal jurisdiction for any action the attorney considers appropriate.  The district attorney or county attorney shall submit the return of the order to exhume within 10 days in the manner prescribed by the issuing court.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

